Massachusetts, session 194th, H1227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 17Q, the following section:- 
3  Section 17R. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
4 meanings: 
5  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
6 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
7 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
8 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
9 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
10  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
11 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 

2 of 16 12 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
13 transcriptome sequencing. 
14  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
15 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
16 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
17 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
18 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
19  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
20 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
21 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
22 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
23 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
24 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
25  (b) The commission shall provide to any active or retired employee of the commonwealth 
26 who is insured under the group insurance commission coverage for biomarker testing as defined 
27 in this section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection (c). 
28  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
29 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
30 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
31  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test; 
32  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 

3 of 16 33  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
34  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
35 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
36 Determinations; or 
37  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
38  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
39 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
40  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
41 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
42 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
43 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
44 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
45 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
46 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
47 deemed granted. 
48  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
49 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
50 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
51  SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
52 section 10L, the following section:- 

4 of 16 53  Section 10M. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
54 meanings: 
55  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
56 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
57 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
58 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
59 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
60  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
61 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
62 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
63 transcriptome sequencing. 
64  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
65 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
66 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
67 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
68 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
69  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
70 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
71 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
72 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
73 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
74 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  

5 of 16 75  (b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance 
76 organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract 
77 to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage 
78 for biomarker testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection 
79 (c). 
80  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
81 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
82 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
83  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
84  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
85  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
86  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
87 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
88 Determinations; or 
89  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
90  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
91 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
92  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
93 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
94 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
95 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 

6 of 16 96 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
97 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
98 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
99 deemed granted. 
100  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
101 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
102 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
103  SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
104 section 47KK, the following section:- 
105  Section 47LL. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
106 meanings: 
107  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
108 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
109 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
110 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
111 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
112  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
113 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
114 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
115 transcriptome sequencing. 

7 of 16 116  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
117 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
118 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
119 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
120 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
121  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
122 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
123 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
124 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
125 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
126 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
127  (b) An individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued under section 108 that 
128 provides benefits for hospital expenses and surgical expenses and any group blanket policy of 
129 accident and sickness insurance issued under section 110 that provides benefits for hospital 
130 expenses and surgical expenses delivered, issued or renewed by agreement between the insurer 
131 and the policyholder, within or outside the commonwealth, shall provide benefits for residents of 
132 the commonwealth and all group members having a principal place of employment in the 
133 commonwealth for biomarker testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established 
134 under subsection (c). 
135  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
136 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
137 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 

8 of 16 138  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
139  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
140  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
141  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
142 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
143 Determinations; or 
144  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
145  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
146 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
147  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
148 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
149 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
150 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
151 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
152 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
153 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
154 deemed granted. 
155  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
156 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
157 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 

9 of 16 158  SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
159 section 8MM, the following section:- 
160  Section 8NN. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
161 meanings: 
162  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
163 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
164 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
165 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
166 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
167  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
168 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
169 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
170 transcriptome, sequencing. 
171  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
172 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
173 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
174 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
175 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
176  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
177 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
178 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
179 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 

10 of 16 180 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
181 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
182  (b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group 
183 hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide 
184 coverage for biomarker testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established under 
185 subsection (c). 
186  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
187 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
188 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
189  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test  
190  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
191  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
192  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
193 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
194 Determinations; or 
195  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
196  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
197 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
198  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
199 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 

11 of 16 200 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
201 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
202 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
203 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
204 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
205 deemed granted. 
206  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
207 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
208 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
209  SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
210 section 4MM, the following section:- 
211  Section 4NN. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
212 meanings: 
213  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
214 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
215 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
216 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
217 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
218  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
219 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
220 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
221 transcriptome sequencing. 

12 of 16 222  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
223 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
224 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
225 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
226 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
227  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
228 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
229 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
230 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
231 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
232 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  
233  (b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement 
234 delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for biomarker 
235 testing as defined in this section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection (c). 
236  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
237 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
238 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
239  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
240  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
241  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 

13 of 16 242  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
243 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
244 Determinations; or 
245  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
246  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
247 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
248  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
249 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
250 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
251 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
252 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
253 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 
254 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
255 deemed granted. 
256  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
257 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
258 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website. 
259  SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
260 section 4EE, as so appearing, the following section:- 
261  Section 4FF. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
262 meanings: 

14 of 16 263  “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and evaluated as an 
264 indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes, or pharmacologic responses to a 
265 specific therapeutic intervention, including known gene-drug interactions for medications being 
266 considered for use or already being administered. Biomarkers include but are not limited to gene 
267 mutations, characteristics of genes or protein expression. 
268  “Biomarker testing” is the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood, or other biospecimen for 
269 the presence of a biomarker.  Biomarker testing includes but is not limited to single-analyte tests, 
270 multi-plex panel tests, protein expression, and whole exome, whole genome, and whole 
271 transcriptome sequencing. 
272  “Consensus statements” as used here are statements developed by an independent, 
273 multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure 
274 and with a conflict of interest policy. These statements are aimed at specific clinical 
275 circumstances and base the statements on the best available evidence for the purpose of 
276 optimizing the outcomes of clinical care. 
277  “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” as used here are evidence-based 
278 clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or medical professional 
279 societies utilizing a transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 
280 interest policy.  Clinical practice guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic 
281 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options and 
282 include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.  

15 of 16 283  (b)  Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed within 
284 or without the commonwealth shall provide coverage for biomarker testing as defined in this 
285 section, pursuant to criteria established under subsection (c). 
286  (c) Biomarker testing must be covered for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, 
287 appropriate management, or ongoing monitoring of an enrollee’s disease or condition when the 
288 test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to: 
289  1. Labeled indications for an FDA-approved or -cleared test 
290  2. Indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug; 
291  3. Warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels; 
292  4. Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) National Coverage 
293 Determinations or any Medicare Administrative Contractor (MAC) Local Coverage 
294 Determinations; or 
295  5. Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus statements. 
296  (d) coverage as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall be provided in a manner that 
297 limits disruptions in care including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples. 
298  (e) In the case of coverage which requires prior authorization, a carrier or a utilization 
299 review organization subject to this section must approve or deny a prior authorization request or 
300 appeal and notify the enrollee, the enrollee’s health care provider and any entity requesting 
301 authorization of the service within 72 hours.  If additional delay would result in significant risk 
302 to the insured’s health or well-being, a carrier or a utilization review organization shall approve 
303 or deny the request within 24 hours. If a response by a carrier or utilization review organization 

16 of 16 304 is not received within the time required under this paragraph, said request or appeal shall be 
305 deemed granted. 
306  (f) The patient and prescribing practitioner shall have access to a clear, readily accessible, 
307 and convenient processes to request an exception to a coverage policy or an adverse utilization 
308 review determination.  The process shall be made readily accessible on the carrier’s website.